Florida, session 2026, HB4047.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1 of chapter 2013-258, Laws of Florida,
is amended to read:
Section 1. Lee County Tourist Development Council;
composition.—Notwithstanding the provisions of s.
125.0104(4)(e), Florida Statutes, the Lee County Tourist
Development Council as established by Lee County ordinance
pursuant to s. 125.0104, Florida Statutes, shall be composed of
eleven nine members who shall be appointed by the Board of
County Commissioners of Lee County. The chair of the Board of
County Commissioners of Lee County or another member as
designated by the chair shall serve on the council. Three Two
members of the council shall be elected municipal officials. The
first municipal official shall be from the most populous
municipality. The second municipal official, one of whom shall
be from one of the municipality two municipalities that
generated the highest revenues from the tourist tax in the most
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4047 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4047 2026 Legislature
recent fiscal year. If the municipality that generated the
highest revenues from the tourist tax in the most recent fiscal
year is also the most populous municipality, then the second
municipal official shall be from the municipality that generated
the second highest revenues from the tourist tax in the most
recent fiscal year previous 2 fiscal years and these two
municipalities shall rotate membership every 2 years. The third
second elected municipal official shall be from the other one of
the remaining municipalities and shall serve a term of one year
the second municipal seat shall also rotate every 2 years.
Elected municipal officials appointed to those two seats on the
council shall serve for terms of 2 years. Seven Six members of
the council shall be persons who are involved in the tourist
industry and have demonstrated an interest in tourist
development, of which members, not less than three nor more than
five four shall be owners or operators of motels, hotels,
recreational vehicle parks, or other tourist accommodations in
the county and subject to the tax. All members of the council
shall be electors of the county. The changes in the composition
of the membership of the Lee County Tourist Development Council
mandated by this act are effective July 1, 2026 2013. The
changes in composition of the membership of the Lee County
Tourist Development Council mandated by the act shall not cause
the interruption of the current term of any person who is a
member of the Lee County Tourist Development Council, except the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4047 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4047 2026 Legislature
two municipal members upon the effective date of this act
appointed on July 1, 2013. Except as specifically provided
herein, the provisions of s. 125.0104(4)(e), Florida Statutes,
shall apply to the Lee County Tourist Development Council.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4047 -01-er